California, session 20252026, AB2406.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1261 of the Military and Veterans Code is amended to read:1261. Any (a) A political subdivision may lease any a lot or building building, or part thereof thereof, belonging to it and not that is not required for public use, for a period not exceeding 20 years, years or may acquire and lease or sublease any a lot or building building, or part thereof thereof, for a period not exceeding 20 years, years to a veterans association, veterans service organization, or nonprofit veteran service agency organized in such the political subdivision, subdivision to be used for the purposes of the veterans association, veterans service organization, or nonprofit veteran service agency. The(b) The rental shall be fixed by the governing body of the political subdivisions, subdivision and may be nominal in amount.